Utah statutes.
17-27a-202.   Applicant notice -- Waiver of requirements.
(1)  For each land use application, the county shall:
(a)  notify the applicant of the date, time, and place of each public hearing
and public meeting to consider the application;
(b)  provide to each applicant a copy of each staff report regarding the
applicant or the pending application at least three business days before the
public hearing or public meeting; and
(c)  notify the applicant of any final action on a pending application.
(2)  If a county fails to comply with the requirements of Subsection (1)(a) or
(b) or both, an applicant may waive the failure so that the application may
stay on the public hearing or public meeting agenda and be considered as if
the requirements had been met.
